Maine, session 132, LD739.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
Courts - Supreme, Superior and District 0063
Initiative: Provides a one-time General Fund appropriation to reimburse the City of
Ellsworth 50% of the costs incurred, up to $750,000, for building an access road to the
property on which the city is working with the judicial branch to build a new courthouse
for Hancock County.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $750,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $750,000 $0